Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 7 Privileges and Immunities of Militia Members

30-7-1.
Exemption of national guard from jury duty.

Every member of the federally recognized national guard shall be exempt from jury duty only while actually on military duty on orders of the United States Department of Defense, or on orders of the governor, or while that member is in receipt of orders to military duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 200; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-1

.

30-7-2.
Immunity from civil process.

No person belonging to the militia of the state shall be arrested on any civil process while going to, remaining at, or during the performance of any militia duty, or returning from any place at which he or she may be required, by competent authority, to attend for militia duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 201; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-2

.

30-7-3.
Immunity from liability for acts in line of duty.

Members of the militia ordered into the service of the state by competent authority shall not be liable, civilly or criminally, for any acts done by them while under orders of a superior officer engaged in the performance of their duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 202; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-3

.

30-7-4.
Defense of actions.

When an action or proceeding of any nature is commenced in any court against any member of the militia for an act done by the member in his or her official capacity in the discharge of his or her duty, or for an alleged omission by the member to do an act that it was his or her duty to perform, or against any officer or enlisted person acting under proper authority or by virtue of a warrant issued to that person pursuant to law, the defendant in that action or proceeding may require the person instituting or prosecuting the action to file security in an amount to be fixed by the court for the payment of costs that may be awarded to the defendant therein. The defendant in all cases may make a general denial and give the special matter in evidence. A defendant in whose favor a nonsuit or a final judgment is rendered in any such action or proceeding shall recover treble costs. The governor shall appoint special counsel, to defend the action or proceeding, at the expense of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 203; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-4

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 32.

30-7-5.
Exemption from duty on election day.

No officer or enlisted person shall be compelled to do militia duty on any day on which a general election is held, except in case of war, riot, invasion, or insurrection, or imminent danger thereof, or in cases of public calamity or catastrophe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 204; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-5

.

30-7-6.
Right-of-way on streets or highways.

The commanding officer of any portion of the militia parading or performing any militia duty in any street or highway may require all persons in such street or highway to yield the right-of-way to the militia, except that the carriage of the United States mail, the legitimate functions of the police, and the progress and operation of hospital ambulances, fire engines, and fire apparatus shall not be interfered with thereby.

Any person, other than those above excepted, who shall hinder, delay, obstruct, or interfere with any portion of the militia parading or performing any militia duty, or who shall attempt to do so, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 205; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-6

.

30-7-7.
Drill by students.

Students in educational institutions in which military science is a part of the course of instruction may, with the consent of the governor, drill and parade with arms in public under the supervision of their instructor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 206; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-7

.

30-7-8.
Bounds of parade and camp grounds.

Every commanding officer when on duty may ascertain and fix necessary bounds and limits to his or her parade or campground, not including any road on which people travel, so as to obstruct the parade or camp ground or prevent their passing for more than two (2) consecutive hours, within which no person shall have a right to pass or enter without leave from the commanding officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 207; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-8

.

30-7-9.
Exemption of pay and allowances from process.

The pay and allowances due, or to become due, to any member of the militia for active service, and any compensation that may be awarded for injuries or death sustained therein, shall be exempt from attachment, execution, or other legal process.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 208; G.L. 1956, §

30-7-9

.

30-7-10.
Servicemembers Civil Relief Act.

All national guard members on state active duty for a continuous period exceeding ninety (90) days shall be entitled to the rights, protections, privileges, and immunities afforded under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq. These rights, protections, privileges, and immunities shall include, but are not limited to, the following: maximum rate of interest not to exceed six percent (6%); continuation of insurance policies; protection from eviction as well as the right to terminate a lease due to military service; and continuance or stay of civil proceedings. Jurisdiction shall be exclusive to the superior court for any alleged violations of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 11.